Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.095

Regional committees—Powers and duties.

The powers and duties of each regional committee are to:

(1) Hear and approve or disapprove proposals for changes in the organization and extent of school districts in the educational service districts when a hearing on a proposal has been requested under RCW 28A.315.199;

(2) Make an equitable adjustment of the property and other assets and of the liabilities, including bonded indebtedness and excess tax levies as otherwise authorized under this section, as to the old school districts and the new district or districts, if any, involved in or affected by a proposed change in the organization and extent of the school districts;

(3) Make an equitable adjustment of the bonded indebtedness outstanding against any of the old and new districts whenever in its judgment such adjustment is advisable, as to all of the school districts involved in or affected by any change heretofore or hereafter effected, subject to the requirements in RCW 28A.315.265;

(4) Provide that territory transferred from a school district by a change in the organization and extent of school districts, other than changes required pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225, shall either remain subject to, or be relieved of, any one or more excess tax levies that are authorized for the school district under RCW 84.52.053 before the effective date of the transfer of territory from the school district;

(5) Provide that territory transferred to a school district by a change in the organization and extent of school districts, other than changes required pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225, shall either be made subject to, or be relieved of, any one or more excess tax levies that are authorized for the school district under RCW 84.52.053 before the effective date of the transfer of territory to the school district;

(6)(a) Provide that a school district that is annexing or receiving territory from a financially insolvent school district pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225 may submit to the voters of the entire school district, including the territory to be annexed or transferred, a proposition for a replacement or supplemental levy pursuant to RCW 84.52.053(2)(b);

(b) Provide that, if an election under (a) of this subsection has not occurred or has failed, territory transferred from a financially insolvent school district to another school district or districts pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225 must be relieved of any one or more excess tax levies that are authorized for the financially insolvent school district under RCW 84.52.053 before the effective date of the transfer of territory from the financially insolvent school district;

(c) Provide that, if an election under (a) of this subsection has not occurred or has failed, territory transferred from a financially insolvent school district to another school district or districts pursuant to RCW 28A.315.225 must be made subject to any one or more excess tax levies that are authorized for the receiving school district or districts under RCW 84.52.053 before the effective date of the transfer of territory to the receiving school district or districts;

(7) Establish the date by which a committee-approved transfer of territory shall take effect;

(8) Hold and keep a record of a public hearing or public hearings (a) on every proposal for the formation of a new school district or for the transfer from one existing district to another of any territory in which children of school age reside or for annexation of territory when the conditions set forth in RCW 28A.315.225 prevail; and (b) on every proposal for adjustment of the assets and of the liabilities of school districts provided for in this chapter. Three members of the regional committee or two members of the committee and the educational service district superintendent may be designated by the committee to hold any public hearing that the committee is required to hold. The regional committee shall cause notice to be given, at least ten days prior to the date appointed for any such hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the geographical boundaries of the school districts affected by the proposed change or adjustment. In addition notice may be given by radio and television, or either thereof, when in the committee's judgment the public interest will be served thereby; and

(9) Prepare and submit to the superintendent of public instruction from time to time or, upon his or her request, reports and recommendations respecting the urgency of need for school plant facilities, the kind and extent of the facilities required, and the development of improved local school administrative units and attendance areas in the case of school districts that seek state assistance in providing school plant facilities.

[ 2012 c 186 s 3; 1999 c 315 s 301.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.